Massachusetts, session 194th, H4635.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21D of chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 46, the words “three hundred dollars”
and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $500.
of 1